California statutes. Financial Code
(b) “Accounts receivable purchase transaction” means a transaction as part of an agreement requiring a recipient to forward or otherwise sell to the provider all or a portion of accounts, payment intangibles, or cash receipts that are owed to the recipient or are collected by the recipient during a specified period or in a specified amount.

(c) “Asset-based lending transaction” means a transaction in which advances are made from time to time contingent on a recipient forwarding payments received from one or more third parties for goods the recipient has supplied
 or services the recipient has rendered to that third party or parties.

(d) (1) “Commercial financing” means an accounts receivable purchase transaction, including factoring, asset-based lending transaction, commercial loan, commercial open-end credit plan, or lease financing transaction intended by the recipient for use primarily for other than personal, family, or household purposes.

(2) For purposes of determining whether financing is commercial financing within the meaning of this subdivision, the provider may rely on any written statement of intended purposes signed by the recipient. The statement may be a separate statement signed by the recipient or may be contained in a loan application or other document signed by the recipient. The provider shall not be required to ascertain that the proceeds of the commercial financing are used in accordance with the
 statement of intended purposes.

(e) “Commercial loan” means a loan of a principal amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, or any loan under an open-end credit plan, the proceeds of which are intended by the recipient for use primarily for other than personal, family, or household purposes.

(f) “Commercial open-end credit plan” means a provider’s plan for making open-end loans pursuant to a loan agreement that sets forth the terms and conditions governing the use of the open-end credit program, and provides that:

(1) The recipient may use the open-end credit program to obtain money, goods, labor, or services or credit, and the provider makes open-end loans to the recipient for the purpose of paying money to, or at the direction of, the recipient or paying obligations that the recipient creates through use of
 the open-end credit program.

(2) The amount of each advance and the charges and other permitted costs are debited to an account.

(3) The charges are computed from time to time on the unpaid balances of the recipient’s account, excluding from the computation any unpaid charges other than permitted fees, costs, and expenses.

(4) The recipient has the privilege of paying the account in full at any time.

(g) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(h) “Depository institution” means any of the following:

(1) A bank, trust company, or industrial loan company doing business under the authority
 of, or in accordance with, a license, certificate, or charter issued by the United States, this state, or any other state, district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(2) A federally chartered savings and loan association, federal savings bank, or federal credit union that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(3) A savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union organized under the laws of this or any other state that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(i) “Factoring” means an accounts receivable purchase transaction that includes an agreement to purchase, transfer, or sell a legally enforceable claim for payment held by a recipient for goods the recipient has supplied or services the recipient has rendered
 that have been ordered but for which payment has not yet been made.

(j) (1) “Lease financing” means providing a lease for goods if the lease includes a purchase option that creates a security interest in the goods leased, as defined in paragraph (35) of subdivision (b) of Section 1201 and Section 1203 of the Commercial Code.

(2) The definition of lease financing in this Division shall not be construed to repeal or otherwise amend existing law related to the definition of leases and security interests under the Commercial Code.

(k) “Payment intangible” means a general intangible under which the account debtor’s principal obligation is a monetary obligation.

(l) “Person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited
 liability company, a joint venture, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, or an unincorporated organization.

(m) “Provider” means a person who extends a specific offer of commercial financing to a recipient. “Provider” also includes a nondepository institution, which enters into a written agreement with a depository institution to arrange for the extension of commercial financing by the depository institution to a recipient via an online lending platform administered by the nondepository institution. The fact that a provider extends a specific offer of commercial financing or lending on behalf of a depository institution shall not be construed to mean that the provider engaged in lending or originated that loan or financing.

(n) “Recipient” means a person who is presented a specific commercial financing offer by a provider that is equal to or less than five hundred
 thousand dollars ($500,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 142.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22801.

This division does not apply to any of the following:

(a) A provider that is a depository institution.

(b) A provider that is a lender regulated under the federal Farm Credit Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2001 et seq.).

(c) A commercial financing transaction secured by real property.

(d) A commercial financing transaction in which the recipient is a dealer, as defined by Section 285 of the Vehicle Code, or an affiliate of such a dealer, or a vehicle rental company, or an affiliate of such a company, pursuant to a specific commercial financing offer or commercial open-end credit plan
 of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), including any commercial loan made pursuant to such a commercial financing transaction.

(e) Any person who makes no more than one commercial financing transaction in California in a 12-month period or any person who makes five or fewer commercial financing transactions in California in a 12-month period that are incidental to the business of the person relying upon the exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1011, Sec. 2.   (SB 1235)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22802.

(a) A provider subject to this division shall disclose all of the information in subdivision (b) or in Section 22803, if applicable, to a recipient at the time of extending a specific commercial financing offer to that recipient, and shall obtain the recipient’s signature on the disclosure before consummating the commercial financing transaction.

(b) Except as provided in Section 22803, a provider subject to this division shall disclose all of the following:

(1) The total amount of funds provided.

(2) The total dollar cost of the financing.

(3) The term or estimated term.

(4) The method, frequency, and amount of payments.

(5) A description of prepayment policies.

(6) The total cost of the financing expressed as an annualized rate.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1011, Sec. 2, 1st text) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.   (SB 33)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22803.

As an alternative to the disclosures required in subdivision (b) of Section 22802, a provider who offers commercial financing that is factoring or asset-based lending and that offers the recipient an agreement that describes the general terms and conditions of the commercial financing transaction that will occur under the agreement, may provide the following disclosures as an example of a transaction that could occur under the general agreement for a given amount of accounts receivables:

(a) An amount financed.

(b) The total dollar cost.

(c) The term or estimated term.

(d) The method, frequency, and amount of payments.

(e) A description of prepayment policies.

(f) The total cost of the financing expressed as an annualized rate.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1011, Sec. 2, 1st text) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 376, Sec. 3.   (SB 33)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22804.

(a) The commissioner shall adopt regulations governing the disclosures described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 22802 and subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 22803. Those regulations shall include all of the following:

(1) Definitions, contents, or methods of calculations for each of the disclosure items set forth in each applicable paragraph of subdivision (b) of Section 22802 and subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 22803.

(2) Requirements concerning the time, manner, and format of the applicable disclosures described in subdivision (b) of Section 22802
 and subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 22803.

(b) The commissioner shall adopt regulations concerning the annualized rate disclosure described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 22802 and subdivision (f) of Section 22803. Those regulations shall include all of the following:

(1) A determination of the appropriate method to express the annualized rate disclosure and the types of fees and charges to be included in that calculation.

(2) When providers shall be permitted to disclose an estimated annualized rate, and how that estimate shall be calculated. The method of calculation determined by this paragraph shall specify the accuracy requirements and tolerance allowances for the calculation, and the types of
 fees and charges to be included in the calculation.

(3) Requirements concerning the time, manner, and format of the disclosure.

(c) A provider shall not be required to comply with the disclosure requirements of this division until the final regulations are adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this section and become effective on the applicable date described in Section 11343.4 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 376, Sec. 5.   (SB 33)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22805.

No provision of this division imposes any liability on a provider as a result of the actual Annual Percentage Rate (APR) charged by a provider differing from the Estimated APR disclosed in conformity with any regulation, order, or written interpretive opinion of the commissioner or any such opinion of the Attorney General, whether or not such regulation, order, or written interpretive opinion is later amended, rescinded, or repealed or determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 22806 by Stats. 2025, Ch. 352, Sec. 3.   (SB 362)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22806.

(a) A provider shall not use the term “interest” or “rate” in a deceptive way that could reasonably result in the recipient being misled.

(b) After extending a specific offer to a potential recipient, whenever a provider states a charge, pricing metric, or financing amount to the potential recipient for that specific offer during an application process for commercial financing, the provider shall also state the annual percentage rate of that commercial financing offer by using the term “annual percentage rate” or the acronym
 “APR.”

(c) Use of the term “interest” or “rate” is not deceptive or likely to mislead for purposes of this division if the metric of financing cost is an annual interest rate or annual percentage rate that is either fixed or floating for the period of the financing and that is expressed as a margin over an index rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 352, Sec. 4.   (SB 362)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22807.

(a) A violation of this division by a person licensed under the California Financing Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000)) shall be deemed a violation of the California Financing Law if the violation relates to a commercial financing transaction that is subject to the California Financing Law.

(b) A violation of this provision shall be deemed an unfair, deceptive, or abusive act or practice under the California Consumer Financial Protection Law (Division 24 (commencing with Section 90000)) if the violation relates to a commercial financing transaction that is not subject to the California Financing Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section
 22000)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 352, Sec. 5.   (SB 362)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. CALIFORNIA DEFERRED DEPOSIT TRANSACTION LAW [23000. - 23106.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [23000. - 23027.]



  ARTICLE 1. Construction and Definitions [23000. - 23001.]

23000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the “California Deferred Deposit Transaction Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23001.

As used in this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Deferred deposit transaction” means a transaction whereby a person defers depositing a customer’s personal check until a specific date, pursuant to a written agreement for a fee or other charge, as provided in Section 23035.

(b) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(d) “Licensee” means any person who offers, originates, or makes a deferred deposit transaction, who arranges a deferred deposit
 transaction for a deferred deposit originator, who acts as an agent for a deferred deposit originator, or who assists a deferred deposit originator in the origination of a deferred deposit transaction. However, “licensee” does not include a state or federally chartered bank, thrift, savings association, industrial loan company, or credit union. “Licensee” also does not include a retail seller engaged primarily in the business of selling consumer goods, including consumables, to retail buyers that cashes checks or issues money orders for a minimum fee not exceeding two dollars ($2) as a service to its customers that is incidental to its main purpose or business. “Licensee” also does not include an employee regularly employed by a licensee at the licensee’s place of business. An employee, when acting under the scope of the employee’s employment, shall be exempt from any other law from which the employee’s employer is exempt.

(e) “Person” means an
 individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, a joint venture, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, an unincorporated organization, a government entity, or a political subdivision of a government entity.

(f) “Deferred deposit originator” means a person who offers, originates, or makes a deferred deposit transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 143.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Licensing and Exemptions [23005. - 23014.]

23005.

(a) A person shall not offer, originate, or make a deferred deposit transaction, arrange a deferred deposit transaction for a deferred deposit originator, act as an agent for a deferred deposit originator, or assist a deferred deposit originator in the origination of a deferred deposit transaction without first obtaining a license from the commissioner and complying with the provisions of this division. The requirements of this subdivision shall not apply to persons or entities that are excluded from the definition of “licensee” as set forth in Section 23001. This division shall not be construed to require the commissioner to create separate classes of licenses.

(b) An application for a license under this division shall be in the form and contain the information
 that the commissioner may by rule require and shall be filed upon payment of the fee specified in Section 23006.

(c) A licensee with one or more licensed locations seeking an additional location license may file a short form license application as may be established by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may by rule or order prescribe circumstances under which to accept electronic records or electronic signatures. This section does not require the commissioner to accept electronic records or electronic signatures.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Electronic record” means an initial license application, or material
 modification of that license application, and any other record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means. “Electronic records” also includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) An application, amendment, supplement, and exhibit, filed for any license, consent, or other authority.

(B) A financial statement, report, or advertising.

(C) An order, license, consent, or other authority.

(D) A notice of public hearing, accusation, and statement of issues in connection with any application, license, consent, or other authority.

(E) A proposed decision of a hearing officer and a decision of the commissioner.

(F) The transcripts of a hearing.

(G) A release, newsletter, interpretive opinion, determination, or specific ruling.

(H) Correspondence between a party and the commissioner directly relating to any document listed in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive.

(2) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with an electronic record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the electronic record.

(f) The Legislature finds and declares that the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation has continuously implemented methods to accept records filed electronically, and is encouraged to continue to expand its use of
 electronic filings to the extent feasible, as budget, resources, and equipment are made available to accomplish that goal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 144.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23006.

At the time of filing the application, the applicant shall pay to the commissioner the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) as a fee for investigating the application, the sum of two hundred dollars ($200) as an application fee, and the cost of fingerprint processing. The investigation fee and application fee are not refundable if an application is denied or withdrawn.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23007.

The applicant shall file with the application financial statements prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and acceptable to the commissioner that indicate a net worth of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). A licensee, regardless of the number of licensed locations, shall maintain a net worth of at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) at all times.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23008.

Upon the filing of an application pursuant to Section 23005 and the payment of fees pursuant to Section 23006, the commissioner shall investigate the applicant, and its general partners and persons owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests if the applicant is a partnership. If the applicant is a corporation, trust, or association, including an unincorporated organization, the commissioner shall investigate its officers, directors, and persons owning or controlling, directly or
 indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding equity securities. If the commissioner determines that the applicant has satisfied this division and does not find facts constituting reasons for denial under Section 23011, the commissioner shall issue and deliver a license to the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23009.

The license shall state the name of the licensee, and if the licensee is a partnership, the names of its general partners, and if a corporation or an association, the date and place of its incorporation or organization, and the address of the licensee’s principal business location. On the approval and licensing of a location pursuant to Section 23008, the commissioner shall issue an original license endorsed to show the address of the authorized location.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23010.

The commissioner may by regulation require licensees to file, at the times that the commissioner may specify, the information that the commissioner may reasonably require regarding any changes in the information provided in any application filed pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23011.

(a) Upon reasonable notice and the opportunity to be heard, the commissioner may deny the application for any of the following reasons:

(1) Any false statement of material fact has been made in the application.

(2) Any officer, director, general partner, or person owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the
 applicant has, within the last 10 years (A) been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to a crime, or (B) committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, if the crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in business in accordance with this division.

(3) The applicant or any officer, director, or general partner, or person owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the outstanding interests or equity securities of the applicant has violated any provision of this division or the rules thereunder or any similar regulatory scheme of the State of California or a foreign jurisdiction.

(b) The application shall be considered withdrawn within the meaning of this section if the applicant fails to respond to a written notification of a deficiency in the application within 90 days of the date of
 the notification.

(c) The commissioner shall, within 60 days from the filing of a full and complete application for a license and the payment of required fees, either issue a license or file a statement of issues prepared in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23011.5.

(a) The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by order, censure or suspend for a period not exceeding 12 months, or bar from any position of employment, management, or control any deferred deposit originator, or any other person, if the commissioner finds either of the following:

(1) That the censure, suspension, or bar is in the public interest and that the person has committed or caused a violation of this division or rule or order of the
 commissioner, which violation was either known or should have been known by the person committing or causing it or has caused material damage to the deferred deposit originator, or to the public.

(2) That the person has been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any crime, or has been held liable in any civil action by final judgment, or any administrative judgment by any public agency, if that crime or civil or administrative judgment involved any offense involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, or any other offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in the business in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(b) Within 15 days from the date of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the person may request a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section
 11400) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Upon receipt of a request, the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 30 days after such receipt unless the person subject to this division consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of such notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(c) Upon receipt of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to this section, the person who is the subject of the proposed order is immediately prohibited from engaging in any activities subject to licensure under the law.

(d) Persons suspended or barred under this section are prohibited from participating in any business activity of a deferred deposit originator and from engaging in any business activity on the premises where a
 deferred deposit originator is conducting business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

23012.

The proceedings for denial of a license shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner has all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23013.

(a) A licensee shall maintain a surety bond in accordance with this subdivision in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). The bond shall be payable to the commissioner and issued by an insurer authorized to do business in this state. A copy of the bond, including any and all riders and endorsements executed subsequent to the effective date of the bond, shall be filed with the commissioner for review and approval within 10 days of execution. For licensees with multiple licensed locations, only one
 surety bond in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) is required. The bond shall be used for the recovery of expenses, fines, and fees levied by the commissioner in accordance with this division or for losses or damages incurred by consumers as the result of a licensee’s noncompliance with the requirements of this division.

(b) When an action is commenced on a licensee’s bond, the commissioner may require the filing of a new bond. Immediately upon recovery of any action on the bond, the licensee shall file a new bond. Failure to file a new bond within 10 days of the recovery on a bond, or within 10 days after notification by the commissioner that a new bond is required, constitutes sufficient grounds for the suspension or revocation of the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23014.

In any proceeding under this division, the burden of proving an exemption or exception is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration and Operations [23015. - 23027.]

23015.

The commissioner may make general rules and regulations and specific rulings, demands, and findings for the enforcement of this division, in addition to, and within the general purposes of, this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23015.5.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly alter, destroy, mutilate, conceal, cover up, falsify, or make a false entry in any record, document, or tangible object with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make an untrue statement to the commissioner during the course of licensing, investigation, or examination, with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 23015 (as added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 101, Sec. 25) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 159.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

23016.

(a) (1) Each licensee shall pay to the commissioner its pro rata share of all costs and expenses reasonably incurred in the administration of this division, as estimated by the commissioner, for the ensuing year and any deficit actually incurred or anticipated in the administration of the program in the year in which the assessment is made.

(2) The pro rata share shall be the proportion that a licensee’s total dollar amount of deferred deposit transactions made bears to the aggregate total dollar amount of deferred deposit transactions made by all licensees as shown by the annual reports to the commissioner pursuant to Section
 23026.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a licensee shall neither be assessed for nor be permitted to pay less than five hundred dollars ($500) per licensed location per year.

(b) On or before the 20th day of May in each year, the commissioner shall notify each licensee by mail of the amount assessed and levied against it and that amount shall be paid within 30 days thereafter. If payment is not made within 30 days, the commissioner may assess and collect a penalty, in addition to the assessment, of 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the
 payment is delayed or withheld.

(c) If a licensee fails to pay the assessment on or before the 30th day of June following the day upon which payment is due, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the certificate issued to the licensee. If, after an order is made, a request for hearing is filed in writing within 30 days, and a hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During any period when its certificate is revoked or suspended, a licensee shall not conduct business pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by order of the commissioner. However, the revocation, suspension, or surrender of a certificate shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 252, Sec. 1.   (AB 3148)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23017.

All money paid or collected under this division shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Corporations Fund. The administration of this division shall be supported out of the State Corporations Fund upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23018.

(a) A license, along with any currently effective order of the commissioner approving a different name pursuant to Section 23023, shall be conspicuously posted in the place of business authorized by the licensee.

(b) A license is not transferable or assignable. A license issued to a partnership or limited partnership is not transferred or assigned within the meaning of this section by the death, withdrawal, or admission of a partner, general partner,
 or limited partner, unless the death, withdrawal, or admission dissolves the partnership to which the license was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23019.

Every licensee shall post a complete, detailed, and unambiguous schedule of fees. The information required by this section shall be clear, legible, and in letters not less than one-half inch in height. The information shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the unobstructed view of the public within the licensee’s location.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23020.

A licensee shall maintain only one place of business under an original or amended license issued pursuant to Section 23008. The commissioner may issue more than one license to the same licensee upon compliance with all the provisions of this division governing an original issuance of a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23021.

(a) If a licensee desires to change its place of business to a street address other than that designated in its license, the licensee shall give written notice to the commissioner at least 10 days prior to the change. The commissioner shall then provide written approval of the change and the date of the approval. A new application shall not be required for a change in the address of an existing business location previously licensed pursuant to this division.

(b) If notice is not given at least 10 days prior to the change, as required by subdivision (a), the commissioner may assess a civil penalty on the licensee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23023.

No licensee shall transact the business licensed or make any transaction provided for by this division under any other name or at any other place of business than that named in the license except pursuant to a currently effective written order of the commissioner authorizing the other name or other place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23024.

Each licensee shall keep and use books, accounts, and records that will enable the commissioner to determine if the licensee is complying with the provisions of this division and with the rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner. Each licensee shall maintain any other records as required by the commissioner. The commissioner or a designee of the commissioner may examine those records at any reasonable time. Upon the request of the commissioner, a licensee shall file an authorization for disclosure of financial records of
 the licensed businesses pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code. All records shall be kept for two years following the last entry on a deferred deposit transaction and shall enable an examiner to review the recordkeeping and reconcile each consumer deferred deposit transaction with documentation maintained in the consumer’s deferred deposit transaction file records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23025.

The department shall maintain a toll-free telephone number for deferred deposit transaction customers to make complaints and express concerns regarding the product or a specific licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 777, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Section operative on December 31, 2004, or sooner, pursuant to Section 23104.)
-------------------------------------------

23026.

On or before March 15 of each year, beginning March 2006, each licensee shall file an annual report with the commissioner pursuant to procedures that the commissioner shall establish, giving the relevant information that the commissioner reasonably requires concerning the business and operations conducted by the licensee within the state during the preceding calendar year for each licensed place of business. The licensee’s annual reports filed pursuant to this section shall be made available to the public for
 inspection, except, upon request in the annual report to the commissioner, the balance sheet contained in the annual report of a sole proprietor or any other nonpublicly traded persons. “Nonpublicly traded person,” for purposes of this section, means persons with securities owned by 35 or fewer individuals. The annual consolidated report shall be prepared by the commissioner and made available to the public. For the previous calendar year, these reports shall include the following and any other information the commissioner reasonably requires:

(a) The total number and dollar amount of deferred deposit transactions made by the licensee.

(b) The total number of individual customers who entered into deferred deposit transactions.

(c) The minimum, maximum, and average amount of deferred deposit transactions.

(d) The average annual percentage rate of deferred deposits.

(e) The average number of days of deferred deposit transactions.

(f) The total number and dollar amount of returned checks.

(g) The total number and dollar amount of checks recovered.

(h) The total number and dollar amount of checks charged off.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 329, Sec. 2.   (AB 1636)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

23027.

(a) No licensee shall advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed or broadcast, in any manner, any statement or representation with regard to the business subject to the provisions of this division, including the rates, terms, or conditions for making or negotiating deferred deposit transactions, that is false, misleading, or deceptive, or that omits material information that is necessary to make the statements not
 false, misleading, or deceptive.
